Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,116
Class IV or V school district; bonds; purchase before maturity.

If it is deemed advisable by the board of education of a Class IV or V school district to purchase bonds issued by the district before maturity, the treasurer shall sell to the highest bidder in the open market, and in a manner prescribed by the board, such bonds or securities as belong to the school funds and the proceeds thereof shall apply to purchase of bonds issued by the district.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 27, p. 327;

R.S.1913, § 7033;

C.S.1922, § 6664;

C.S.1929, § 79-2727;

R.S.1943, § 79-2731;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 219, p. 762;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-532;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 762.